Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1226.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(a) introductory paragraph of the act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1438, No.118), known as the Massage Therapy Law, is amended to read:Section 3. Board.(a) Establishment.--There is established the State Board of Massage Therapy, an administrative board within the department. The board shall consist of 11 members [who are citizens of the United States and] who have been residents of this Commonwealth for at least a five-year period prior to the effective date of this section. The board shall be composed of the following individuals:12345678910111213141516171819 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1226PN1442 - 2 - 12